Utah statutes.
30-1-4.1.   Marriage recognition policy.

(1) (a)  It is the policy of this state to recognize as marriage only the legal union of a man and a woman as provided in this chapter.

(b)  Except for the relationship of marriage between a man and a woman recognized pursuant to this chapter, this state will not recognize, enforce, or give legal effect to any law creating any legal status, rights, benefits, or duties that are substantially equivalent to those provided under Utah law to a man and a woman because they are married.

(2)  Nothing in Subsection (1) impairs any contract or other rights, benefits, or duties that are enforceable independently of this section.



Enacted by Chapter 261, 2004 General Session

